New Jersey, session 221, S341.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The Commissioner of Education shall annually recommend the dates on which a school district may close the schools of the district for a spring break.  If a school district determines to close the schools of the district for a spring break, the district shall consider the recommendation of the commissioner as part of its scheduling. b.    On an annual basis, the commissioner shall inform school districts of the recommended dates of spring break no later than June 30th of the prior school year. 2.    This act shall take effect in the 1[2023-2024] first full1 school year 1following the date of enactment1, except the commissioner may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.